Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-327
Death of registered voter; removal from registration records; Department of Health and Human Services; duty.

The election commissioner or county clerk may at any time remove from the voter registration register a voter registration of a deceased person when the election commissioner or county clerk has any supporting information of the death of such voter. The Department of Health and Human Services shall provide, at cost, a record of the deaths of residents which occur in each county every three months to the appropriate election commissioner or county clerk.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 89;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 14;

Laws 1999, LB 234, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 52.